Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.530

"Unprofessional conduct."

In addition to those acts defined in chapter 18.130 RCW, the term "unprofessional conduct" as used in RCW 18.32.530 through 18.32.755 includes gross, willful, or continued overcharging for professional services.

[ 1989 c 202 s 26; 1986 c 259 s 41; 1977 ex.s. c 5 s 3.]

NOTES:

Savings—1986 c 259 ss 36, 37, 41, 43: See note following RCW 18.32.665.

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.

Violation of chapter 69.50 RCW, the Uniform Controlled Substances Act—Suspension of license: RCW 69.50.413.